Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2837.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 328, O.S.L.
2022, as amended by Section 1, Chapter 415, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S.
Supp. 2024, Section 427.14b), is amended to read as follows:
Section 427.14b. A. Beginning January 1, 2024, the Oklahoma
Medical Marijuana Authority shall require employees of a medical
marijuana business licensee to apply for and receive a credential
authorizing the employee to work in a licensed medical marijuana
business.
B. The Authority may contract with one or more third-party
vendors to provide the credentialing services necessary to carry out
the provisions of this section.

C. The Authority shall determine the services to be provided by
such third-party vendor and shall establish costs and prices. If
contracted for credentialing services, a third-party vendor shall on
behalf of the Authority conduct the background checks and verify
eligibility and suitability for any employees of a medical marijuana
business license holder to obtain a credential.
D. Upon successful completion by the third-party vendor of the
national fingerprint-based background check conducted by the
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation within thirty (30) days prior
to the application, completion of the educational training required
pursuant to the provisions of this section, and verification of
eligibility and suitability for an employee, the third-party vendor
Authority shall issue a credential to the employee. The applicant
shall submit proof of completion of the required educational
training in the credential application, and the results of
background checks and verifications shall be provided to the
Authority by the third-party vendor.
E. Beginning January 1, 2027, in order to receive an employee
credential, all employees of a licensed medical marijuana business
shall annually complete an educational training course provided by
or approved by the Authority. The employee shall submit proof of
completion of the required educational training in order to receive
an employee credential. Such training may include an overview of
state statutes and administrative rules, patient privacy
requirements, and the safe handling and storage of medical
marijuana.
F. If the third-party vendor determines that an employee of a
medical marijuana business holder does not meet the minimum
statutory requirements for a credential, the applicant or employee
shall have no recourse against the third-party vendor but may appeal
such adverse determination to the Authority.
F. G. The third-party vendor shall not be civilly liable to an
applicant, licensee, or employee of a licensee for any acts taken in
good-faith compliance with the provisions of Section 420 et seq. of
this title and the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection
Act and the rules promulgated by the Oklahoma Medical Marijuana
Authority.
G. H. 1. The Authority shall review the medical marijuana
credential application; approve, reject, or deny the application;
ENR. H. B. NO. 2837 Page 2

and send the approval, rejection, or denial letter to the applicant
by the same method in which the application was submitted to the
Authority.
2. Each approved applicant shall be issued a credential, which
shall act as proof of his or her approved status, to be worn or
displayed during the employee’s hours of work of the employee.
Rejection and denial letters shall provide a reason for the
rejection or denial. Applications may only be rejected or denied
for failure to meet the standards set forth in the provisions of the
Oklahoma Medical Marijuana and Patient Protection Act or rules
promulgated by the Executive Director. If an application is
rejected for failure to provide required information, the applicant
shall have thirty (30) days to submit the required information for
reconsideration. Unless the Authority determines otherwise, an
application that has been resubmitted but is still incomplete or
contains errors that are not clerical or typographical in nature
shall be denied.
H. I. The Executive Director of the Authority may promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2837 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2837 Page 4